Utah statutes.
58-37c-2.   Purpose.
The purpose of this act is to provide for the licensure of regulated
distributors and regulated purchasers engaged in regulated transactions of
listed controlled substance precursor chemicals as they are identified in the
act or rules adopted pursuant to the act, to provide for maintaining of
records and submission of reports with respect to regulated transactions, to
provide for reasonable and necessary regulation of defined types of
transactions, to provide that violation of the provisions of this act shall be
unlawful and unprofessional conduct, and to provide for criminal and
administrative actions for that conduct.
